test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kask8_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kask: # Noun (8) kask 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kask+N+Sg+Nom: kask
     kask+N+Sg+Gen: kaska
     kask+N+Sg+Par: kaskat
     kask+N+Sg+Ill: [kaskahe, kaskadõ]
     kask+N+Sg+Ine: [kaskan, kaskah, kaskahn]
     kask+N+Sg+Ela: kaskast
     kask+N+Sg+All: kaskalõ
     kask+N+Sg+Ade: kaskal
     kask+N+Sg+Abl: kaskalt
     kask+N+Sg+Tra: kaskas
     kask+N+Sg+Ter: kaskaniq
     kask+N+Sg+Abe: kaskaldaq
     kask+N+Sg+Com: kaskagaq
     kask+N+Pl+Nom: kaskaq
     kask+N+Pl+Gen: [kaskidõ, kaskiidõ]
     kask+N+Pl+Par: [kaskit, kaskiid]
     kask+N+Pl+Ill: [kaskihe, kaskiihe, kaskidõ, kaskiidõ]
     kask+N+Pl+Ine: [kaskin, kaskih, kaskihn, kaskiin, kaskiih, kaskiihn]
     kask+N+Pl+Ela: [kaskist, kaskiist]
     kask+N+Pl+All: [kaskilõ, kaskiilõ]
     kask+N+Pl+Ade: [kaskil, kaskiil]
     kask+N+Pl+Abl: [kaskilt, kaskiilt]
     kask+N+Pl+Tra: [kaskis, kaskiis]
     kask+N+Pl+Ter: [kaskiniq, kaskiiniq]
     kask+N+Pl+Abe: [kaskildaq, kaskiildaq]
     kask+N+Pl+Com: [kaskidõgaq, kaskiidõgaq]
